California, session 20252026, AB1538.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 177 is added to the Penal Code, to read:177. (a) It is unlawful for an elected or appointed official, under color of authority, to retaliate or exert political retribution against a person for exercising a state or federal constitutional right, with the intent to suppress another from continuing to exercise a state or federal constitutional right.(b) A violation of this section is punishable by forfeiture of office and disqualification from holding any office in this state or a political subdivision thereof. office.(c) For purposes of this section, the following shall apply:(1) “Retaliation” means intentionally engaging in acts of reprisal, threats, coercion, or similar acts against another, including organizations.(2) “Political retribution” means intentionally using governmental or institutional authority to engage in acts of reprisal, threats, coercion, or similar acts against another, including organizations.(d) This section does not apply to the hiring or personnel decisions of an elected or appointed official relative to an employee or prospective employee of that elected or appointed official. This section does not remove any protection or recourse available for an employee or prospective employee to remedy a wrongful employment action.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.